District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-519

Assignment of limited partner’s interest; rights of assignee; rights, powers, restrictions or substituted limited partner.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 659, Pub. L. 87-716, § 19
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856
1981 Ed., § 41-219.
1973 Ed., § 41-419.